Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-105 Required reading test;
authorization and availability. (a) Every insurer shall use the Flesch
reading ease test to determine the readability of any contract. Whenever the
commissioner determines that the Flesch reading ease test is inappropriate for
the purposes of determining readability, the commissioner shall prescribe an
alternative test comparable in result to the Flesch reading ease test to be
used by the insurer.

(b) The commissioner shall provide each
insurer with a copy of the Flesch reading ease test. Whenever an alternative
test is prescribed, the commissioner shall provide a copy of the test to each
insurer, accompanied by a set of instructions explaining the manner in which
such test shall be conducted. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next